Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2927
Physical therapist assistant; perform physical therapy services; when; limitations; supervising physical therapist; powers and duties.

(1) A physical therapist assistant may perform physical therapy services under the general supervision of a physical therapist, except that no physical therapist assistant shall perform the following:

(a) Interpretation of physician referrals;

(b) Development of a plan of care;

(c) Initial evaluations or reevaluation of patients;

(d) Readjustment of a plan of care without consultation with the supervising physical therapist; or

(e) Discharge planning for patients.

(2) A physical therapist may provide general supervision for no more than two physical therapist assistants. A physical therapist shall not establish a satellite office at which a physical therapist assistant provides care without the general supervision of the physical therapist.

(3) A physical therapist shall reevaluate or reexamine on a regular basis each patient receiving physical therapy services from a physical therapist assistant under the general supervision of the physical therapist.

(4) A supervising physical therapist and the physical therapist assistant under general supervision shall review the plan of care on a regular basis for each patient receiving physical therapy services from the physical therapist assistant.

(5) A physical therapist assistant may document physical therapy services provided by the physical therapist assistant without the signature of the supervising physical therapist.

(6) A physical therapist assistant may act as a clinical instructor for physical therapist assistant students in an approved educational program.

Laws 1979, LB 355, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-2810;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 141;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,385;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1020.